Montana, session 2025, SB214.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 76-2-105, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-105. Continuation of prior nonconforming uses. (1) Existing nonconforming uses may be
continued although not in conformity with such zoning regulations The zoning regulations must allow for the
nonconforming use of land or buildings legal at the time or prior to the time that a zoning regulation or
amendment to the regulation was adopted, but the board of county commissioners may provide grounds for
discontinuing nonconforming uses based on changes to or abandonment of the use of the land or buildings
after the adoption of a zoning regulation or amendment.
(2) Any ambiguity or uncertainty in the zoning regulations as to whether a nonconforming use is
allowed or whether the use was allowed when it was commenced must be interpreted in favor of the
nonconforming use."
Section 2. Section 76-2-113, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-113. Enforcement and interpretation of zoning provisions. (1) If any building or structure is
erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, repaired, converted, or maintained or if any building, structure, or
land is used in violation of this part or of any resolution adopted under this part, the county, in addition to other
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 214
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 214
remedies, may take any appropriate action or begin proceedings to:
(1)(a) prevent the unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, conversion,
maintenance, or use;
(2)(b) restrain, correct, or abate a violation;
(3)(c) prevent the occupancy of a building, structure, or land; or
(4)(d) prevent any illegal act, conduct, business, or use in or near the premises.
(2) In interpreting a use and in determining whether a use violates this part or a resolution adopted
under this part, any ambiguity or uncertainty in the zoning regulations as to whether the use is in violation must
be interpreted in favor of the use in question."
Section 3. Section 76-2-208, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-208. Continuation of nonconforming uses. (1) Any lawful use which is made of land or
buildings at the time any zoning resolution is adopted by the board of county commissioners may be continued
although such use does not conform to the provisions of such resolution The zoning regulations must allow for
the nonconforming use of land or buildings legal at the time or prior to the time that a zoning regulation or
amendment to the regulation was adopted, but the board of county commissioners may provide grounds for
discontinuing nonconforming uses based on changes to or abandonment of the use of the land or buildings
after the adoption of a zoning regulation or amendment.
(2) Any ambiguity or uncertainty in the zoning regulations as to whether a nonconforming use is
allowed or whether the use was allowed when it was commenced must be interpreted in favor of the
nonconforming use."
Section 4. Section 76-2-210, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-210. Enforcement and interpretation of zoning provisions. (1) If any building or structure is
erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, repaired, converted, or maintained or any building, structure, or
land is used in violation of this part or of any resolution adopted under this part, the county, in addition to other
remedies, may institute any appropriate action or proceedings to:
(a) prevent the unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, conversion,
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 214
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 214
maintenance, or use;
(b) restrain, correct, or abate a violation;
(c) prevent the occupancy of the building, structure, or land; or
(d) prevent any illegal act, conduct, business, or use in or near the premises.
(2) In interpreting a use and in determining whether a use violates this part or a resolution adopted
under this part, any ambiguity or uncertainty in the zoning regulations as to whether the use is in violation must
be interpreted in favor of the use in question.
(2)(3) For the purposes of enforcing subsections (1)(a) through (1)(c), the county shall attempt to
obtain voluntary compliance at least 30 days before filing a complaint for a violation of this part that is subject to
the penalties under 76-2-211.
(3)(4) The board of county commissioners may appoint enforcing officers to supervise and enforce
the provisions of the zoning resolutions."
Section 5. Section 76-2-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-302. Zoning districts. (1) For the purposes of 76-2-301, the local city or town council or other
legislative body may divide the municipality into districts of the number, shape, and area as are considered best
suited to carry out the purposes of this part. Within the districts, it may regulate and restrict the erection,
construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, or use of buildings, structures, or land, including the creation of
zoning districts that allow tiny dwelling units.
(2) All regulations must be uniform for each class or kind of buildings throughout each district, but
the regulations in one district may differ from those in other districts.
(3) In a proceeding for a permit or variance to place manufactured housing within a residential
zoning district, there is a rebuttable presumption that placement of a manufactured home will not adversely
affect property values of conventional housing.
(4) As used in this section, the following definitions apply:
(a) "Manufactured housing" means a single-family dwelling, built offsite in a factory, that is in
compliance with the applicable prevailing standards of the United States department of housing and urban
development at the time of its production. A manufactured home does not include a mobile home or
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – SB 214
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 214
housetrailer, as defined in 15-1-101.
(b) (i) "Tiny dwelling unit" means a residential dwelling unit that is 350 to 750 square feet, is on a
permanent foundation, and is used as a single-family dwelling for at least 45 days or longer.
(ii) Appendix Q, tiny houses, of the International Building Code as it was printed on January 1,
2023, may govern all other requirements of a tiny dwelling unit that is 350 to 750 square feet.
(5) This section may not be construed to limit conditions imposed in historic districts, local design
review standards, existing covenants, or the ability to enter into covenants pursuant to Title 70, chapter 17, part
2. Local design review standards imposed by a local government must be clear, objective, and necessary to
protect public health or safety or to comply with federal law.
(6) Zoning regulations may not include a requirement to:
(a) pay a fee for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at specified sale
prices; or
(b) dedicate real property for the purpose of providing housing for specified income levels or at
specified sale prices.
(7) A dedication of real property as prohibited in subsection (6)(b) includes a payment or other
contribution to a local housing authority or the reservation of real property for future development of housing for
specified income levels or specified sale prices.
(8) (a) Except as provided in subsection (8)(b), when When reviewing an application for a zoning
permit or variance from local design review standards, the determination of compliance with local design review
standards as provided in subsection (5) must be conducted by employees of the municipality, and the
municipality may not require review by an external board.
(b) Subsection (8)(a) does not apply to historic preservation boards reviewing an application for a
permit or variance to structures or districts that the local government has designated as historic or that are
listed on the national register of historic places as defined in the National Historic Preservation Act of 1966 as it
read on October 1, 2023."
Section 6. Section 76-2-308, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-2-308. Enforcement and interpretation of zoning regulations and ordinances. (1) The city or
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – SB 214
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 214
town council or other legislative body may provide by ordinance for the enforcement of this part and of any a
regulation or ordinance made thereunder under the provisions of this part.
(2) In case any building or structure is erected, constructed, reconstructed, altered, repaired,
converted, or maintained or any building, structure, or land is used in violation of this part or of any ordinance or
other regulation made under authority conferred hereby by this part, the proper local authorities of the
municipality, in addition to other remedies, may institute any appropriate action or proceedings to:
(a) prevent such the unlawful erection, construction, reconstruction, alteration, repair, conversion,
maintenance, or use;
(b) to restrain, correct, or abate such a violation; to
(c) prevent the occupancy of such the building, structure, or land; or to
(d) prevent any illegal act, conduct, business, or use in or about such near the premises.
(3) In interpreting a use and in determining whether a use violates this part or a resolution adopted
under this part, any ambiguity or uncertainty in the zoning regulations as to whether the use is in violation must
be interpreted in favor of the use in question."
Section 7. Continuation of nonconforming uses. (1) The zoning regulations must allow for the
nonconforming use of land or buildings legal at the time or prior to the time that a zoning regulation or
amendment to the regulation is adopted, but the local government may provide grounds for discontinuing
nonconforming uses based on changes to or abandonment of the use of the land or buildings after the adoption
of a zoning regulation or amendment.
(2) Any ambiguity or uncertainty in the zoning regulations as to whether a nonconforming use is
allowed or whether the use was allowed when it was commenced must be interpreted in favor of the free use of
property in question.
Section 8. Section 76-25-301, MCA, is amended to read:
"76-25-301. Authority to adopt local zoning regulations. (1) (a) A local government subject to this
chapter, within its respective jurisdiction, has the authority to and shall regulate the use of land in substantial
compliance with its adopted land use plan by adopting zoning regulations.
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – SB 214
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 214
(b) The governing body of a county or city has the authority to adopt zoning regulations in
accordance with this part by an ordinance that substantially complies with 7-5-103 through 7-5-107.
(c) A municipality shall adopt zoning regulations for the portions of the jurisdictional area outside of
the boundaries of the municipality that the governing body anticipates may be annexed into the municipality
over the next 20 years. Unless otherwise agreed to by the applicable jurisdictions, zoning regulations on
property outside the municipal boundaries may not apply or be enforced until those areas are annexed or are
being annexed into the municipality.
(2) Local zoning regulations authorized in subsection (1) include but are not limited to ordinances
prescribing the:
(a) uses of land;
(b) density of uses;
(c) types of uses;
(d) size, character, number, form, and mass of structures; and
(e) development standards mitigating the impacts of development, as identified and analyzed
during the land use planning process and review and adoption of zoning regulations pursuant to this chapter.
(3) The local government shall incorporate any existing zoning regulations adopted pursuant to
Title 76, chapter 2, into the zoning regulations meeting the requirements of this chapter.
(4) The local government shall adopt a zoning map for the jurisdiction in substantial compliance
with the land use plan and future land use map and the zoning regulations adopted pursuant to this section,
graphically illustrating the zone or zones that a property within the jurisdiction is subject to.
(5) The local government may provide for the issuance of permits as may be necessary for the
implementation of this chapter.
(6) (a) The zoning regulations and map must identify areas that may necessitate the denial of a
development or a specific type of development, such as unmitigable natural hazards, insufficient water supply,
inadequate drainage, lack of access, inadequate public services, or the excessive expenditure of public funds
for the supply of the services.
(b) The regulations must prohibit development in the areas identified in subsection (6)(a) unless
the hazards or impacts may be eliminated or overcome by approved construction techniques or other mitigation
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – SB 214
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 SB 214
measures identified in the zoning regulations.
(c) Approved construction techniques or other mitigation measures described in subsection (6)(b)
may not include building regulations as defined in 50-60-101 other than those identified by the department of
labor and industry as provided in 50-60-901.
(7) The zoning regulations and map must mitigate the hazards created by development in areas
located within the floodway of a flood of 100-year frequency, as defined by Title 76, chapter 5, or determined to
be subject to flooding by the governing body. If the hazards cannot be mitigated, the zoning regulations and
map must identify those areas where future development is limited or prohibited.
(8) (a) The zoning regulations must allow for the continued use of land or buildings legal at the
time that any zoning regulation, map, or amendment thereto of these is adopted, but the local government may
provide grounds for discontinuing nonconforming uses based on changes to or abandonment of the use of the
land or buildings after the adoption of a zoning regulation, map, or amendment.
(b) Any ambiguity or uncertainty in the zoning regulations as to whether a nonconforming use is
allowed or whether the use was allowed when it was commenced must be interpreted in favor of the
nonconforming use.
(9) In interpreting a use and in determining whether a use violates this chapter or a resolution
adopted under this chapter, any ambiguity or uncertainty in the zoning regulations as to whether the use is in
violation must be interpreted in favor of the use in question."
Section 9. Codification instruction. [Section 7] is intended to be codified as an integral part of Title
76, chapter 2, part 3, and the provisions of Title 76, chapter 2, part 3, apply to [section 7].
Section 10. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – SB 214
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
SB 214, originated in the Senate.
___________________________________________
Secretary of the Senate
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

SENATE BILL NO. 214
INTRODUCED BY G. HERTZ
AN ACT REVISING ZONING LAWS; PROVIDING THAT THE USE OF PROPERTY MUST BE FAVORED IN
CASES INVOLVING AN INTERPRETATION OF USE OR WHETHER A NONCONFORMING USE OF LAND IS
ALLOWED AND THERE IS AMBIGUITY AS TO THE USE OR PRIOR USE; REMOVING THE EXCEPTION
THAT HISTORIC PRESERVATION BOARDS MAY REVIEW APPLICATIONS FOR ZONING PERMITS AND
VARIANCES; AMENDING SECTIONS 76-2-105, 76-2-113, 76-2-208, 76-2-210, 76-2-302, 76-2-308, AND 76-
25-301, MCA; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE DATE.